Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4318.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. An employer who, that, with the intent to defraud, fails to make payment of does not pay the wages and fringe benefits due an employee as provided in this act , is guilty of a misdemeanor, crime punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both.as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the wages and fringe benefits have a value of less than $200.00, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $500.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. If the employer has 1 or more prior convictions under this section, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the wages and fringe benefits have a value of $200.00 or more but less than $1,000.00, the employer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $2,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. If the employer has 1 or more prior convictions under this section, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, if the wages and fringe benefits have a value of $1,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, a fine of not more than $10,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. If the employer has 2 or more prior convictions under this section, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years, a fine of not more than $15,000.00 or 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, whichever is greater, or both imprisonment and a fine. (d) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years, a fine of not more than 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, or both imprisonment and a fine. (e) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, a fine of not more than 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, or both imprisonment and a fine. (f) If the wages and fringe benefits have a value of $100,000.00 or more, the employer is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years, a fine of not more than 3 times the value of the wages and fringe benefits, or both imprisonment and a fine. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.